Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-231
Habitual offender, defined.

Habitual offender means a person who has been convicted of violating the Game Law two or more times in any calendar year or who has been convicted of violating the Game Law three or more times in any ten-year period beginning with the date of the first conviction.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 41.